Wyoming, session 2025, SF0092.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Wyoming:

Section 1. W.S. 35-11-215 is created to read:

SF0092

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0500
35-11-215. Carbon dioxide; beneficial treatment;
state policy.

(a) The legislature finds that:

(i) Carbon dioxide is a foundational nutrient
necessary for all life on earth. Plants need carbon dioxide
along with sunlight, water and nutrients to prosper. The
more carbon dioxide available for this, the better life can
flourish;

(ii) The carbon cycle, where carbon dioxide is
reused and transferred between the atmosphere and organisms
on earth, is a biological necessity for life on earth;

(iii) Agricultural production worldwide is
outpacing population growth and breaking production records
primarily due to increasing atmospheric carbon dioxide;

(iv) More carbon dioxide allows plants to better
resist drought by using water more efficiently;

SF0092

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0500
(v) The national aeronautics and space
administration has confirmed that global vegetation is
increasing from the near-polar regions to the equator. The
largest contributor to this greening of the earth is
increasing carbon dioxide;

(vi) Carbon dioxide levels are currently at
approximately four hundred twenty (420) parts per million,
which is at near-historically low concentrations. The
current carbon dioxide levels are one-sixth (1/6) of the
average of two thousand six hundred (2,600) parts per
million over geologic time;

(vii) It is estimated that carbon dioxide levels
need to exceed one hundred fifty (150) parts per million to
ensure the survival of plant life on earth;

(viii) The earth needs carbon dioxide to support
life and to increase plant yields, both of which will
contribute to the health and prosperity of all Wyoming
citizens.

(b) It is the policy of the state of Wyoming that:
SF0092

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0500

(i) Carbon dioxide is a foundational nutrient
necessary for life on earth;

(ii) Carbon dioxide shall not be designated or
treated as a pollutant or contaminant;

(iii) The state of Wyoming shall not pursue any
targets or measures that support the reduction or
elimination of carbon dioxide, including any "net-zero"
targets.

Section 2. W.S. 37-1-101(a)(intro) and 37-2-134(a)(i)
and (iv) are amended to read:

37-1-101. Definitions.

(a) As used in chapters 1, 2, 3, 12, and 17 and 18 of
this title:

37-2-134. Electric generation facility closures;
presumption; commission review.

SF0092

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0500
(a) As used in this section:

(i) "Dispatchable" means as defined in W.S.
37-18-101(a)(ii) a source of electricity that is available
for use on demand and that can be dispatched upon request
of a power grid operator or that can have its power output
adjusted, according to market needs and includes
dispatchability;

(iv) "Reliable" means as defined in W.S.
37-18-101(a)(iv) generated electricity that is not subject
to intermittent availability.

Section 3. W.S. 37-1-101(a)(vi)(N), 37-18-101 and
37-18-102 are repealed.

Section 4. Not later than sixty (60) days after the
effective date of this act, each public utility that
recovered rates from customers under W.S. 37-18-102(c)(i)
or (iii), as repealed by section 3 of this act, shall
refund those rates to customers who paid them, provided
that the utility shall not be required to refund rates
recovered under W.S. 37-18-102(c)(i) and (iii) that the
SF0092

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0500
utility had expended for carbon capture, utilization and
storage technology before the effective date of this act.
Refunds required under this section shall be in a form and
manner specified by the public service commission.

Section 5. The public service commission shall
promulgate all rules necessary to implement this act.

Section 6. This act is effective immediately upon
completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law
as provided by Article 4, Section 8 of the Wyoming
Constitution.

(END)
SF0092